test/src/morphology/N-kiintsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kīntš*: # Noun 148 'eng /est küüs /fin' - full paradigm
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Nom: kīntš*
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Gen: kīnd
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Par: kīndtõ
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Dat: kīndõn
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Ins: kīndkõks
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Ill: kīndõ
     kīntš*+N+Sg+Ela: kīndstõ
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Nom: kīndõd
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Gen: kīndõd
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Par: kīntši
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Dat: kīndõdõn
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Ins: kīndõdõkd
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Ill: kīndiž
     kīntš*+N+Pl+Ela: kīndist
